Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 Department of Defense

38-2-130.
Creation; executive head; definition.

There shall be an agency of the state government to be known as the Department of Defense of the State of Georgia which shall be composed of the military agency as provided in the laws of this state. The adjutant general shall be the executive head of the Department of Defense.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 6; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 20; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 901; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, § 1.

Cross references.

Creation of Emergency Management Division, Department of Defense, §

38-3-20

.

38-2-131.
Military division authorized; executive head; definition.

There shall be within the Department of Defense, as a division thereof, a state military agency which shall be styled and known as the “Military Division, Department of Defense” with the adjutant general as the executive head thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

38-2-132.
Administration of militia and Department of Defense; personnel; State Personnel Board.

The militia of the state shall be commanded and its affairs administered pursuant to law by the Governor, as commander in chief, through the Department of Defense and the military division thereof which shall consist of the adjutant general, two assistant adjutants general, and such other officers, enlisted personnel, and civilian employees as the adjutant general shall from time to time prescribe; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prejudice the status under the rules of the State Personnel Board of any person employed in the Military Division, Department of Defense. Such other officers, enlisted personnel, and civilian employees shall perform such duties as may be required by the adjutant general who shall fix their compensation subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 22; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-60/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”